zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 轮式溜冰鞋: 花样轮滑鞋; 轮滑阻拦赛轮滑鞋; 健身双排轮滑鞋; 轮滑球双排轮滑鞋; 果酱轮滑鞋; 竞赛双排轮滑鞋; 休闲双排轮滑鞋; 城市双排轮滑鞋
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Patins à roulettes: Patins à roulettes artistiques; Patins à roulettes de roller derby; Patins à roulettes de fitness; Patins à roulettes de hockey; Patins à roulettes de jam; Patins à roulettes de course; Patins à roulettes récréatifs; Patins à roulettes urbains
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Görkorcsolyák: Műkorcsolya görkorcsolyák; Roller derby görkorcsolyák; Fitneszgörkorcsolyák; Hoki kétsoros görkorcsolyák; Jam kétsoros görkorcsolyák; Versenygörkorcsolyák; Szabadidős görkorcsolyák; Városi görkorcsolyák
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Pattini classici: Pattini a rotelle artistici; Pattini a rotelle da derby; Pattini a rotelle per fitness; Pattini a rotelle da hockey; Pattini a rotelle da jam skating; Pattini a rotelle da gara; Pattini a rotelle ricreativi; Pattini a rotelle urbani
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Πατίνια: Ρόλερ καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ; Ρόλερ ντέρμπι; Πατίνια Fitness; Ρόλερ χόκεϊ; Ρόλερ Jam; Αγωνιστικά πατίνια; Πατίνια αναψυχής; Πατίνια πόλης
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Patines de cuatro ruedas: Patines sobre ruedas artísticos; Patines sobre ruedas de roller derby; Patines de cuatro ruedas para fitness; Patines sobre ruedas de hockey; Patines sobre ruedas de jam; Patines de cuatro ruedas de competición; Patines de de cuatro ruedas de recreación; Patines de cuatro ruedas urbanos
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Patine cu rotile: Patine cu role pentru patinaj artistic; Patine cu rotile pentru derby; Patine cu rotile fitness; Patine cu rotile pentru hochei; Patine cu rotile pentru jam skating; Patine cu rotile pentru curse; Patine cu rotile de agrement; Patine cu rotile de oraș
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Rollerskates: Kunstlauf-Rollschuhe; Roller-Derby-Rollschuhe; Fitness-Rollerskates; Rollhockey-Rollschuhe; Jam-Skating-Rollschuhe; Rollerskates für Rennen; Freizeit-Rollerskates; Urban-Rollerskates
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Rolschaatsen: Kunstrolschaatsen; Derby-rolschaatsen; Fitness-rolschaatsen; Hockeyrolschaatsen; Jamrolschaatsen; Race-rolschaatsen; Recreatie-rolschaatsen; Urban rolschaatsen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Rullaluistimet: Taitorullaluistimet; Roller derby -luistimet; Rullaluistimet fitnesskäyttöön; Rullakiekkoluistimet; Jam skating -rullaluistimet; Rullaluistimet kilpakäyttöön; Rullaluistimet vapaa-ajan käyttöön; Rullaluistimet kaupunkikäyttöön
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Tekerlekli Patenler: Artistik tekerlekli patenler; Derbi tekerlekli patenleri; Fitness Tekerlekli Paten; Hokey tekerlekli patenleri; Jam tekerlekli patenleri; Yarış Patenleri; Rekreasyon Tekerlekli Paten; Kentsel Paten
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Kolieskové korčule: Umelecké kolieskové korčule; Kolieskové korčule na derby; Fitness kolieskové korčule; Hokejové kolieskové korčule; Tanečné kolieskové korčule; Závodné kolieskové korčule; Rekreačné kolieskové korčule; Mestské kolieskové korčule
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Rulleskøjter: Kunstløbsrulleskøjter; Derby-rulleskøjter; Rulleskøjter – fitness; Hockey-rulleskøjter; Jam-rulleskøjter; Rulleskøjter – race; Rulleskøjter – fritid; Rulleskøjter – urban
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Patins de 4 rodas: Patins de 4 rodas artísticos; Patins de 4 rodas de roller derby; Patins de 4 rodas para fitness; Patins de 4 rodas de hóquei; Patins de 4 rodas de jam; Patins de 4 rodas para corrida; Patins de 4 rodas recreativos; Patins de 4 rodas urbanos
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Trekové brusle: Krasobruslařské trekové brusle; Trekové brusle na roller derby; Fitness kolečkové brusle; Hokejové trekové brusle; Trekové brusle na jam skating; Závodní kolečkové brusle; Rekreační kolečkové brusle; Urban kolečkové brusle
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > ローラースケート靴: アーティスティックローラースケート; ダービー用ローラースケート; フィットネス用ローラースケート靴; ホッケー用ローラースケート; ジャム用ローラースケート; レース用ローラースケート靴; リクリエーション用ローラースケート靴; アーバンローラースケート靴
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Giày trượt patanh: Giày trượt patin nghệ thuật; Giày trượt patin roller derby; Giày trượt pa-tanh thể dục; Giày trượt patin 4 bánh khúc côn cầu; Giày trượt patin jam; Giày trượt pa-tanh thi đấu; Giày trượt pa-tanh giải trí; Giày trượt pa-tanh đô thị
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Kotalke: Rolerji za umetnostno rolanje; Rolerji za derby; Kotalke za fitnes; Rolerji za hokej; Plesne kotalke; Tekmovalne kotalke; Kotalke za rekreacijo; Mestne kotalke
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Rullskridskor: Rullskridskor för konståkning; Derbyrullskridskor; Fitnessrullskridskor; Hockeyrullskridskor; Jam-rullskridskor; Racingrullskridskor; Fritidsrullskridskor; Stadsrullskridskor
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Roller Skates: Artistic Roller Skates; Derby Roller Skates; Fitness Roller Skates; Hockey Roller Skates; Jam Roller Skates; Race Roller Skates; Recreation Roller Skates; Urban Roller Skates
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Patins: Patins artísticos; Patins para roller derby; Patins sobre rodas fitness; Patins tradicionais para hóquei; Patins para jam skating; Patins sobre rodas de corrida; Patins sobre rodas de recreação; Patins sobre rodas urbanos
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > โรลเลอร์สเกต: โรลเลอร์สเกตลีลา; โรลเลอร์สเกตดาร์บี้; โรลเลอร์สเกตเพื่อฟิตเนส; โรลเลอร์สเกตฮอกกี้; โรลเลอร์สเกตแจม; โรลเลอร์สเกตสำหรับแข่ง; โรลเลอร์สเกตเพื่อสันทนาการ; โรลเลอร์สเกตสำหรับสัญจรในเมือง
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Ролики-квады: Роликовые коньки для фигурного катания; Роликовые коньки для роллер-дерби; Фитнес-квады; Хоккейные роликовые коньки; Роликовые коньки для джем-скейтинга; Ролики-квады для скоростного катания; Прогулочные ролики-квады; Ролики-квады для городского катания
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 롤러스케이트: 피겨 롤러스케이트; 더비 롤러스케이트; 피트니스 롤러 스케이트; 하키 롤러스케이트; 잼 롤러스케이트; 레이싱 롤러 스케이트; 취미용 롤러 스케이트; 도시형 롤러 스케이트
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Koturaljke: Umjetničke koturaljke; Koturaljke derby; Koturaljke za fitness; Koturaljke za hokej; Koturaljke za jam skating; Koturaljke za utrke; Koturaljke za rekreaciju; Koturaljke za ulicu
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Rulleskøyter: Kunstløp-rulleskøyter; Derby-rulleskøyter; Fitness-rulleskøyter; Hockey-rulleskøyter; Jam-rulleskøyter; Racing-rulleskøyter; Fritidsrulleskøyter; Urban-rulleskøyter
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Wrotki: Wrotki figurowe; Wrotki do roller derby; Wrotki fitness; Wrotki hokejowe; Wrotki do jam skatingu; Wrotki wyścigowe; Wrotki rekreacyjne; Wrotki miejskie
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Riedučiai: Meninio čiuožimo riedučiai; Derbio riedučiai; Sveikatingumo riedučiai; Ledo ritulio riedučiai; Šokio ir laisvo stiliaus riedučiai; Lenktyniniai riedučiai; Pramoginiai riedučiai; Miesto riedučiai
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Ролкови кънки: Артистични ролкови кънки; Ролкови кънки за дерби; Ролкови кънки за спортни тренировки; Ролкови кънки за хокей; Джем ролкови кънки; Състезателни ролкови кънки; Ролкови кънки за дълги разстояния; Ролкови кънки за градска среда
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 溜冰鞋: 花式滑輪鞋; 競速滑輪鞋; 健身輪式溜冰鞋; 曲棍球滑輪鞋; 舞步滑輪鞋; 競速輪式溜冰鞋; 休閒輪式溜冰鞋; 城市輪式溜冰鞋